Alaska statutes. Title 20. Infants and Incompetents.
Text

(TRANSFERRED)

OCTOBER 1982

Annotations

Transfer of AS 20. —

The provisions of this title have been transferred to
AS 25.23 by the revisor of statutes pursuant to
AS

01.05.031

. The following table indicates the present disposition of those provisions:

Former Section New Section 20.15.010 25.23.010 20.15.020 25.23.020 20.15.030 25.23.030 20.15.040 25.23.040 20.15.050 25.23.050 20.15.060 25.23.060 20.15.070 25.23.070 20.15.080 25.23.080 20.15.090 25.23.090 20.15.100 25.23.100 20.15.110 25.23.110 20.15.120 25.23.120 20.15.130 25.23.130 20.15.140 25.23.140 20.15.150 25.23.150 20.15.160 25.23.160 20.15.170 25.23.170; 25.23.175 20.15.180 25.23.180 20.15.190 25.23.190 20.15.200 25.23.200 20.15.210 25.23.210 20.15.220 25.23.220 20.15.230 25.23.230 20.15.240 25.23.240 20.20.010 25.20.045

Click to view